Maryland, session 2025, HB0216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–121.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PARTICIPATING DEALER” MEANS A DEALER THAT CHOOSES TO
PROVIDE THE REBATE UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE DEALER’S CUSTOMERS.
(3) “PROGRAM WEBSITE” MEANS A WEBSITE ESTABLISHED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION TO ADMINISTER THE REBATE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) “ZERO–EMISSION PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE VEHICLE” MEANS A
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT:
(I) IS MADE BY A MANUFACTURER;
(II) HAS A MAXIMUM SPEED CAPABILITY OF AT LEAST 55 MILES
PER HOUR; AND
(III) IS PROPELLED BY AN ELECTRIC MOTOR THAT DRAWS
ELECTRICITY FROM A BATTERY THAT IS CAPABLE OF BEING RECHARGED FROM AN
EXTERNAL SOURCE OF ELECTRICITY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A ZERO–EMISSION PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE VEHICLE THAT:
(I) HAS NOT BEEN MODIFIED FROM ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER
SPECIFICATIONS;
(II) IS ACQUIRED FOR USE OR LEASE BY THE TAXPAYER AND
NOT FOR RESALE;
(III) HAS A BASE PURCHASE PRICE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000;

HOUSE BILL 216 3
(IV) HAS A BATTERY CAPACITY OF AT LEAST 5.0
KILOWATT–HOURS; AND
(V) IS PURCHASED NEW AND TITLED FOR THE FIRST TIME ON
OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2028; AND
(2) A FUEL CELL ELECTRIC VEHICLE THAT:
(I) HAS NOT BEEN MODIFIED FROM ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER
SPECIFICATIONS;
(II) IS ACQUIRED FOR USE OR LEASE BY THE TAXPAYER AND
NOT FOR RESALE;
(III) HAS A BASE PURCHASE PRICE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000;
AND
(IV) IS PURCHASED NEW AND TITLED FOR THE FIRST TIME ON
OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2028.
(C) THERE IS AN ELECTRIC VEHICLE REBATE PROGRAM.
(D) SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, A REBATE IS ALLOWED FOR A
ZERO–EMISSION PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE VEHICLE OR FUEL CELL ELECTRIC
VEHICLE.
(E) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE REBATE ALLOWED
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL EQUAL:
(1) $3,000 FOR EACH ZERO–EMISSION PLUG–IN ELECTRIC DRIVE
VEHICLE OR FUEL CELL ELECTRIC VEHICLE PURCHASED; OR
(2) (I) $1,000 FOR EACH TWO–WHEELED ZERO–EMISSION
ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE PURCHASED; OR
(II) $2,000 FOR EACH THREE–WHEELED ZERO–EMISSION
ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE OR AUTOCYCLE PURCHASED.
(F) THE REBATE ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IS LIMITED TO THE
ACQUISITION OF:
(1) ONE VEHICLE PER INDIVIDUAL; AND
(2) 10 VEHICLES PER BUSINESS ENTITY.

HOUSE BILL 216
(G) A REBATE MAY NOT BE CLAIMED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A VEHICLE
UNLESS THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(H) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE REBATE UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REBATE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE PROVIDED ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROGRAM WEBSITE.
(4) SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING AND THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION, A PARTICIPATING DEALER SHALL PROVIDE THE REBATE UNDER THIS
SECTION TO AN ELIGIBLE BUYER AT THE TIME THE BUYER PURCHASES AN ELIGIBLE
VEHICLE.
(5) A PARTICIPATING DEALER SHALL PROVIDE THE REBATE TO A
BUYER IN THE FORM OF A REDUCTION OF THE VEHICLE’S PURCHASE PRICE EQUAL
TO THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE REBATE FOR WHICH THE VEHICLE PURCHASED IS
ELIGIBLE.
(6) ON AT LEAST A DAILY BASIS, A PARTICIPATING DEALER SHALL
REPORT TO THE ADMINISTRATION THROUGH THE PROGRAM WEBSITE EACH SALE
OF A VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE PARTICIPATING DEALER PROVIDED A REBATE.
(7) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REQUIRE A DEALER TO
REPORT THROUGH THE PROGRAM WEBSITE INFORMATION REGARDING VEHICLES
SOLD THAT THE ADMINISTRATION CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE
REBATE PROGRAM.
(II) THE INFORMATION THE ADMINISTRATION REQUIRES
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE
FOR DEALERS TO RECEIVE A TRANSFER OF THE CLEAN VEHICLE CREDIT UNDER §
30D(G) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OR THE PREVIOUSLY OWNED CLEAN
VEHICLE CREDIT UNDER § 25E(F) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(8) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH A PROCESS THROUGH WHICH A DEALER MAY
CLAIM REIMBURSEMENT THROUGH THE PROGRAM WEBSITE FOR REBATES
PROVIDED BY THE DEALER;

HOUSE BILL 216 5
(II) PROCESS CLAIMS FOR REIMBURSEMENT AS
EXPEDITIOUSLY AS PRACTICABLE; AND
(III) PAY ALL REIMBURSEMENTS FROM THE TRANSPORTATION
TRUST FUND.
(9) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL MONITOR THE AGGREGATE
AMOUNT OF REBATES AWARDED IN EACH FISCAL YEAR AND NOTIFY DEALERS
THROUGH THE PROGRAM WEBSITE WHEN THE AVAILABLE FUNDING FOR THE FISCAL
YEAR IS EXHAUSTED AND NO FURTHER REBATES MAY BE PROVIDED.
13–809.
(a) (3) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii) [and], (iii), AND (IV) of this
paragraph, “total purchase price” means the price of a vehicle agreed on by the buyer and
the seller, including any dealer processing charge, less an allowance for trade–in but with
no allowance for other nonmonetary consideration.
(IV) THE “TOTAL PURCHASE PRICE” MAY NOT BE REDUCED BY
THE AMOUNT OF A REBATE PROVIDED UNDER § 12–121 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[13–815.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Autocycle” has the meaning stated in § 11–103.4 of this article.
(3) “Excise tax” means the tax imposed under § 13–809 of this subtitle.
(4) “Zero–emission plug–in electric drive vehicle” means a motor vehicle
that:
(i) Is made by a manufacturer;
(ii) Has a maximum speed capability of at least 55 miles per hour;
and
(iii) Is propelled by an electric motor that draws electricity from a
battery that:
1. Has a capacity of not less than 4 kilowatt–hours; and
2. Is capable of being recharged from an external source of
electricity.
(b) This section applies only to:

HOUSE BILL 216
(1) A zero–emission plug–in electric drive vehicle that:
(i) Has not been modified from original manufacturer specifications;
(ii) Is acquired for use or lease by the taxpayer and not for resale;
(iii) Has a base purchase price not exceeding $50,000;
(iv) Has a battery capacity of at least 5.0 kilowatt–hours; and
(v) Is purchased new and titled for the first time on or after July 1,
2023, but before July 1, 2027; and
(2) A fuel cell electric vehicle that:
(i) Has not been modified from original manufacturer specifications;
(ii) Is acquired for use or lease by the taxpayer and not for resale;
(iii) Has a base purchase price not exceeding $50,000; and
(iv) Is purchased new and titled for the first time on or after July 1,
2023, but before July 1, 2027.
(c) Subject to available funding, an excise tax credit is allowed for a zero–emission
plug–in electric drive vehicle or fuel cell electric vehicle.
(d) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, the credit allowed under this section
shall equal:
(1) $3,000 for each zero–emission plug–in electric drive vehicle or fuel cell
electric vehicle purchased; or
(2) (i) $1,000 for each two–wheeled zero–emission electric motorcycle
purchased; or
(ii) $2,000 for each three–wheeled zero–emission electric motorcycle
or autocycle purchased.
(e) The credit allowed under this section is limited to the acquisition of:
(1) One vehicle per individual; and
(2) 10 vehicles per business entity.
(f) A credit may not be claimed under this section:

HOUSE BILL 216 7
(1) For a vehicle unless the vehicle is registered in the State; or
(2) Unless the manufacturer has already conformed to any applicable State
or federal laws or regulations governing clean–fuel vehicle or electric vehicle purchases
applicable during the calendar year in which the vehicle is titled.
(g) The Motor Vehicle Administration shall administer the credit under this
section.]
Chapter 234 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and notwithstanding any other
provision of law, for [each of] fiscal [years 2024 through] YEAR 2027, the Maryland Energy
Administration shall transfer from the Strategic Energy Investment Fund established
under § 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article to the Transportation Trust Fund the
amount determined under subsection (b) of this section to offset [a reduction in revenues
from the vehicle excise tax credit] THE COST OF REBATES for qualified zero–emission
plug–in electric drive vehicles, fuel cell electric vehicles, two–wheeled
zero–emission electric motorcycles, and three–wheeled zero–emission electric motorcycles
or autocycles under [§ 13–815] § 12–121 of the Transportation Article, as enacted by
[Section 1 of this Act] CHAPTER __ (H.B. ___) (5LR1623) OF THE ACTS OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2025.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for [each] fiscal year 2027
the Maryland Energy Administration shall determine the amount to transfer under
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) For [each of] fiscal [years 2024 through] YEAR 2027, the amount
transferred under subsection (a) of this section may not exceed the lesser of $8,250,000 or
the total amount of [credits] REBATES allowed [against the excise tax] for that fiscal year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.